Washington statutes.
RCW 35.98.030

Invalidity of part of title not to affect remainder.

If any provision, section, or chapter of this title or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the provision, section, chapter, or title, or the application thereof to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.98.030.]